Maine, session 132, LD2045.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §10708, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2005, c. 85, §1, is further
amended to read:
3. Noncredit courses. Offer courses or programs that are not for academic credit; and
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §10708, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2005, c. 85, §2, is amended
to read:
4. Religious, nonpublic, educational institution. Meet the following criteria.
A. The educational institution must be substantially owned, operated or supported by
a bona fide church or religious organization.
B. The educational programs of the educational institution must be primarily designed
for, aimed at and attended by persons who seek to learn the particular religious faith or
beliefs of the church or religious organization under paragraph A.
C. The programs under paragraph B must be intended to prepare students to assume
leadership positions in, or enter into some other vocation closely related to, the
particular faith of the church or religious organization under paragraph A.
The exemption under this subsection does not apply to any educational institution that
represents to any student or prospective student that the major purpose of its program is to
prepare the student for a vocation not closely related to the particular religious faith of the
educational institution or to provide the student with a general educational program
substantially equivalent to the educational programs offered by schools or departments or
branches of schools that are not exempt from this section. Any educational institution
receiving an exemption under this subsection must inform all applicants of its exempt status
in writing and must prominently display the following statement on all written materials,
including, but not limited to, any electronic materials, made available to potential
applicants or to the general public: "Pursuant to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 20‑A,
section 10708, subsection 4, this institution is not required to obtain authorization from
either the State Board of Education or the Maine State Legislature in order to: (1) use the
name "junior college," "college" or "university," (2) offer courses or programs for academic
credit or (3) confer degrees."; and
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §10708, sub-§5 is enacted to read:
5. Certain branch or extension campuses. Operate a branch or extension campus
within this State that is affiliated with a nonprofit educational institution operating in
another state that:
A. Has been continuously authorized by the state board to offer degree programs at
the graduate level in this State for 5 years or more;
B. Has been continuously accredited as a degree-granting educational institution for
10 years or more by an accrediting association recognized by the state board;
C. Maintains eligibility to participate in financial aid programs under the federal
Higher Education Act of 1965, Title IV; and
D. Is recognized for its extensive academic research and innovation, doctoral programs
and advanced facilities and resources.
Page 1 - 132LR2728(01)

The exemption under this subsection applies only to a branch or extension campus within
this State that meets the requirements of this subsection.